en: Corned beef
de: Corned Beef
fr: Corned-beef, Corned-beef appertisé, Corned-beef en conserve
hr: Usoljena govedina
ja: コーンビーフ

en: Coppa, Capicola, Capocollo
fr: Coppa
hr: Coppa
it: Coppa, Capocollo
nl: Capocollo

xx: Liverwurst
en: Liverwurst
bg: Колбаси от черен дроб
de: Leberwürste, Leberwurst
fi: Maksamakkarat
hr: Jetrene kobasice
hu: Májkolbászok
nl: Leverworsten

en: Teewurst
xx: Teewurst
de: Teewurst

en: French meat products
fr: Produits carnés français

en: Hams
bg: Шунка
ca: Pernil
da: Skinke
de: Schinken
es: jamón
fi: kinkut
fr: Jambons, Jambon
hr: šunke
hu: Sonkák
it: Prosciutti, prosciutto
ja: 豚もも肉
nl: Hammen
pl: Szynka
pt: Presuntos
ru: Ветчина
sv: Skinkor, Skinka
th: แฮม
tr: Jambon
zh: 火腿

en: Pork ham escalope
fr: Escalope de porc, Escalopes de porc, Escalope de jambon de porc

en: Cooked pork ham escalope
fr: escalope de jambon de porc cuite

en: Pork way leg without rind fat and bone
fr: Porc jambon sans jarret sans bateau découenné dégraisssé désossé

en: Frozen pork way leg without rind fat and bone
fr: Porc jambon surgelé sans jarret sans bateau découenné dégraisssé désossé

en: Dry-cured ham with fat and rind removed
fr: Jambon sec découenné dégraissé

en: Braised hams
de: Geschmorter Schinken
es: Jamón braceado
fr: Jambons braisés
hr: Pirjane šunke
hu: Párolt sonka
it: Prosciutti brasati
nl: Gesmoorde ham

en: Pork knuckle, Pork shank
fr: Jarret de porc

en: Frozen pork knuckle
fr: Jarret de porc surgelé

en: Knuckle of ham cooked
fr: Jambonneau cuit

en: Pork knuckle of ham without rind without fat without bone
fr: Jambonneau de porc, Jambonneau arrière de porc découenné dégraisssé désossé

en: Braised ham on the bone
fr: Jambon à l'os braisé

en: Round of ham cooked
fr: Rond de jambon cuit

en: White hams with less salt
fi: Kypsennetyt kinkut vähennetyllä suolalla
fr: Jambons blancs à teneur réduite en sel, jambon blanc à teneur réduite en sel
hr: Bijele šunke s manje soli
hu: Fehér sonka kevés sóval
it: Prosciutti cotti con meno sale
nl: Witte hammen met minder zout

en: White smoked hams
fi: kypsät savustetut kinkut
fr: Jambons blancs fumés, jambons cuits fumés, Jambon blanc fumé, jambon cuit fumé
hr: Bijele dimljene šunke
hu: Fehér füstölt sonka
nl: gerookte gekookte ham